Maine, session 132, LD414.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 10 MRSA c. 206-D is enacted to read:
CHAPTER 206-D
PRICE TRANSPARENCY FOR SHORT-TERM LODGING RENTALS AND
TICKET SALES
§1250-P. Price transparency for short-term lodging rentals and ticket sales
1. Definitions. As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Mandatory fee" means a fee or charge required as part of an advertised price,
including, but not limited to, a resort fee, service charge or convenience fee.
"Mandatory fee" does not include:
(1) Taxes or fees imposed by a government or quasi-governmental entity or
assessment fees imposed on the transaction by a government-created special
district or program;
(2) Shipping fees or charges that reasonably reflect the amount of the charges a
business incurs to send physical goods to consumers through the mail, including
private mail services; or
(3) Amounts charged for ancillary goods or services offered to a consumer as part
of the same transaction.
B. "Short-term lodging" means an accommodation for transient occupancy in a hotel,
motel, vacation rental or similar establishment, typically for under 30 days.
C. "Ticket" has the same meaning as in Title 8, section 1301, subsection 1, paragraph
C.
Page 1 - 132LR1086(03)

2. Total price disclosure. A person advertising or offering for rent or renting a short-
term lodging or a person advertising or offering for sale or selling a ticket:
A. Shall clearly and conspicuously disclose the total price of the short-term lodging or
ticket, including any mandatory fee, whenever the price is advertised or displayed;
B. Shall display the total price of the short-term lodging or ticket more prominently
than other pricing information in all advertisements, offers or displays; and
C. May not misrepresent any fee or charge associated with a short-term lodging or
ticket in any advertisement, offer or display.
The requirements of this subsection do not apply to a provider of short-term lodging or a
person advertising or offering for sale or selling a ticket that complies with the provisions
of 16 Code of Federal Regulations, Part 464.
3. Enforcement. The Attorney General shall enforce this section.
4. Violation. A person that violates this section commits an unfair and deceptive act
and a violation of Title 5, chapter 10.
Page 2 - 132LR1086(03)